Missouri, session 2026, SB1015.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 632, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
eight new sections, to be known as sections 632.580, 632.585,
632.590, 632.593, 632.595, 632.600, 632.605, and 632.610, to
read as follows:
632.580. The definitions set forth in section 632.005
shall apply to sections 632.580 to 632.610. In addition, as
used in sections 632.580 to 632.610, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Assisted outpatient treatment", court-ordered
involuntary outpatient mental health care services that are
provided by a mental health program under a treatment plan
developed and monitored by a master's level mental health
professional. Such services may include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Case management;
(b) Medication management;
(c) Therapy or counseling;
(d) Substance use treatment, if applicable;
(e) Crisis intervention services; and
(f) Assistance with housing, employment, or other
community resources necessary for an individual's stability;


(2) "Case manager", a mental health professional
employed by a certified community mental health center who
is assigned to a respondent to oversee the respondent's
compliance with the outpatient treatment plan ordered by the
court under sections 632.580 to 632.610;
(3) "Community mental health center", the same meaning
given to the term in section 205.975;
(4) "Comprehensive mental health services", the same
meaning given to the term in section 205.975;
(5) "Local public health agency", a county health
center board established under chapter 205, a county health
department, a combined city and county health department or
agency, a multicounty health department or agency, or any
other county health authority;
(6) "Petition", a petition for assisted outpatient
treatment filed under section 632.585 or for continued
assisted outpatient treatment filed under section 632.600;
(7) "Respondent", a person who is alleged in a
petition to meet the criteria for assisted outpatient
treatment in section 632.590;
(8) "Service area", the same meaning given to the term
in section 205.975.
632.585. 1. A petition for an order authorizing
assisted outpatient treatment may be filed by:
(1) The director, administrator, or treating physician
of a mental health program in which the respondent is
hospitalized;
(2) The director, administrator, or treating physician
of an emergency receiving center in which the respondent is
receiving services;
(3) A licensed physician, a registered professional
nurse designated by the community mental health center and
approved by the department of mental health, or a mental


health professional from whom the respondent is receiving
services;
(4) The appointed guardian or limited guardian of a
ward who is the respondent; or
(5) The department of health and senior services, the
department of mental health, or any local public health
agency located within the probate jurisdiction in which the
petition is filed.
2. The petition may be filed in the court having
probate jurisdiction in which the respondent is present or
reasonably believed to be present or in the probate
jurisdiction in which the respondent resides.
3. The petition shall allege under oath, without a
notarization requirement, that the petitioner has reason to
believe that the respondent meets the criteria for assisted
outpatient treatment in section 632.590. The petition shall
specify factual information on which such belief is based
and shall contain the names and addresses of all persons
known to the petitioner who have knowledge of such facts
through personal observation.
4. No notarization shall be required for a petition or
for any affidavits, declarations, or other documents
supporting a petition. The petition and any affidavits,
declarations, or other documents supporting the petition
shall be subject to the provisions of section 492.060
allowing for declaration under penalty of perjury.
5. The prosecuting attorney of the county in which a
hearing on a petition takes place shall represent the
petitioner and file and prosecute in court all petitions.
Such duty shall be fulfilled by the county counselor in
counties having a county counselor and by the circuit
attorney in any city not within a county.


632.590. Following receipt of a petition and
completion of the procedures required in section 632.593, a
court may issue an order requiring a respondent to
participate in assisted outpatient treatment if:
(1) The respondent:
(a) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Is suffering from a mental illness;
(c) Will not obtain treatment in the community
voluntarily; and
(d) Is unable to make an informed decision to seek or
to comply with voluntary treatment; and
(2) Either:
(a) Because of the respondent's fulfillment of the
criteria of subdivision (1) of this section, the respondent
requires treatment to prevent a deterioration in the
respondent's mental illness that would be likely to result
in serious harm to the respondent or others as described in
section 632.305; or
(b) The respondent has a history of a lack of
compliance with treatment for the respondent's mental
illness, and within the thirty-six months immediately
preceding the date of the filing of the petition such lack
of compliance has either:
a. At least twice, been a significant factor in
necessitating a civil detention period for treatment
instituted under sections 632.120 or 632.305 or receipt of
services in a forensic or other mental health unit of any
state or local correctional facility, not including any
period during which the respondent was hospitalized or
incarcerated immediately preceding the date of the filing of
the petition; or
b. Resulted in one or more acts of violent behavior
with the intention of causing serious physical injury toward


self or others or threats of, or attempts of, serious
physical harm to self or others, not including any period
during which the respondent was hospitalized or incarcerated
immediately preceding the date of the filing of the petition.
632.593. 1. At the time of filing the petition, the
court clerk shall set a date and time for the hearing, which
shall take place within two judicial days of the filing of
the petition. An attorney shall be appointed to represent
the respondent as required under section 632.450 from the
register of attorneys described in section 632.415. An
attorney so appointed shall be entitled to attorney's fees
to the same extent as allowed under section 632.415. The
clerk shall promptly notify the respondent, the respondent's
attorney, the petitioner, and the petitioner's attorney of
the date and time for the hearing. The court shall not
grant continuances except upon a showing of good and
sufficient cause.
2. The hearing shall be conducted in as informal a
manner as may be consistent with orderly procedure and in a
physical setting not likely to have a harmful effect on the
respondent. The respondent shall have the following rights
in addition to those specified elsewhere:
(1) To be represented by an attorney;
(2) To present evidence on his or her own behalf;
(3) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him
or her;
(4) To remain silent;
(5) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the
court file of his or her case;
(6) To have the hearing open or closed to the public
as he or she elects;
(7) To be proceeded against according to the rules of
evidence applicable to civil judicial proceedings; and


(8) To have the hearing before a jury if requested by
the respondent or his or her attorney.
3. The respondent shall be present at the hearing
unless the respondent's physical condition is such that he
or she cannot be present in the courtroom or if the court
determines that the respondent's conduct in the courtroom is
so disruptive that the proceedings cannot reasonably
continue.
4. The burden of proof at the hearing shall be by
clear and convincing evidence and shall be upon the
petitioner.
5. If the matter is tried before a jury, the jury
shall determine and shall be instructed only upon the issue
of whether the respondent meets the criteria for assisted
outpatient treatment in section 632.590. The remaining
procedures for the jury trial shall be as in other civil
matters.
6. The respondent shall not be required to file an
answer or other responsive pleading.
7. At the conclusion of the hearing, if the court or
jury finds, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that
the respondent meets the criteria for assisted outpatient
treatment in section 632.590, and the court finds that a
mental health program appropriate to handle the respondent's
condition has agreed to accept the respondent, the court
shall issue an order requiring the respondent to participate
in assisted outpatient treatment with the mental health
program for a period not to exceed two years.
8. At the conclusion of the hearing, if the court or
jury does not find by clear and convincing evidence that the
respondent meets the criteria for assisted outpatient
treatment in section 632.590, the court shall dismiss the
petition.


9. An order requiring the respondent to participate in
assisted outpatient treatment based on satisfaction of the
provisions of subparagraph a. of paragraph (b) of
subdivision (2) of section 632.590 shall not be issued
unless the court has considered, or the jury has been
instructed to consider, at least the following factors:
(1) The respondent's ability to access finances in
order to obtain food or medicine;
(2) The respondent's ability to obtain treatment for
the respondent's medical condition;
(3) The respondent's ability to access necessary
resources in the community without assistance;
(4) The degree to which there are risks to the
respondent's safety;
(5) The likelihood that the respondent will
decompensate without immediate care or treatment;
(6) The respondent's previous attempts to inflict
physical injury on self or others;
(7) The respondent's history of behavioral health
treatment in the community;
(8) The respondent's patterns of decompensation in the
past;
(9) The respondent's risk of being victimized or
harmed by others; and
(10) The respondent's access to the means to inflict
harm on self or others.
10. Nothing in this section shall prevent the court or
jury from considering any other factor not described in this
section.
11. If requested by the respondent, the court shall
appoint an available licensed physician or licensed
psychologist to examine the respondent and testify at the
respondent's request. If the respondent or the respondent's


attorney so requests, the court shall not appoint a licensed
physician or licensed psychologist who is an employee of any
entity in which the respondent is hospitalized or receiving
services or who is an employee of any entity that filed the
100 petition. The appointment procedures in section 632.420
101 shall apply to any appointment under this subsection.
102 12. The physician-patient privilege recognized by
103 section 491.060 and the psychologist-patient privilege
104 recognized by section 337.055 shall be deemed waived in
105 proceedings under sections 632.580 to 632.610. The fact
106 that such privileges have been waived in accordance with
107 this section shall not by itself waive the privileges in any
108 other proceeding, civil or criminal. The waiver of the
109 privileges shall extend only to that evidence that is
110 directly material and relevant to the proceedings under
111 sections 632.580 to 632.610.
112 13. Appeals from court orders under this section may
113 be made as described in section 632.430.
114 14. Assisted outpatient treatment shall not be deemed
115 outpatient detention for purposes of this chapter, and no
116 provision of this chapter relating to the requirements for
117 inpatient or outpatient detention proceedings shall apply to
118 assisted outpatient treatment under sections 632.580 to
119 632.610 unless such provision has been specifically
120 incorporated into sections 632.580 to 632.610 by reference
121 or otherwise.
122 15. The provisions of section 632.440 shall apply to
123 assisted outpatient treatment under sections 632.580 to
124 632.610.
632.595. 1. The court shall assign a case manager
from a certified community behavioral health clinic to each
respondent ordered to participate in assisted outpatient
treatment.


2. The case manager and the respondent shall report to
the court at least once every ninety days. The court may,
at its discretion, request more frequent appearances. The
case manager shall immediately report to the court a
substantial failure of the respondent or the mental health
program providing the assisted outpatient treatment to
comply with the conditions of the assisted outpatient
treatment.
632.600. 1. The court order for assisted outpatient
treatment shall expire at the end of the period specified in
the order unless a petition for an extension has been
filed. If any person or entity authorized to file a
petition under section 632.585 determines that a respondent
requires further involuntary assisted outpatient treatment,
the person or entity shall file a petition for continued
assisted outpatient treatment before the expiration of the
involuntary assisted outpatient treatment ordered by the
court.
2. The procedure for obtaining an extension shall be
the same as for obtaining the original order, except that
the thirty-six-month time period provided in paragraph (b)
of subdivision (2) of section 632.590 shall not be
applicable in determining the appropriateness of an
extension.
632.605. 1. During the period of an order for
assisted outpatient treatment, if the mental health program
or mental health professional who is providing the
respondent's assisted outpatient treatment determines that
the respondent is not complying with the court order, the
mental health program or mental health professional shall
notify the court immediately.
2. If it comes to the attention of the court that a
respondent subject to an order of assisted outpatient


treatment is not complying with the order, the court may
require one or more of the following, without a hearing:
(1) That the respondent be taken for evaluation to a
community mental health center providing comprehensive
mental health services to individuals residing in the
service area in which the respondent resides;
(2) That the respondent be hospitalized in a
psychiatric hospital for a period of not more than ten days;
and
(3) Upon recommendation by the community mental health
center providing comprehensive mental health services to
individuals residing in the service area in which the
respondent resides, that the individual be hospitalized for
a period of more than ten days, but not longer than the
duration of the order for assisted outpatient treatment, or
not longer than ninety days, whichever is less.
3. The court may direct peace officers to transport
the respondent to a designated facility or a community
mental health center, as applicable, and the court may
specify conditions under which the respondent may return to
assisted outpatient treatment before the order expires.
Reimbursement for transportation costs shall be allowed as
provided under section 632.312.
4. A respondent hospitalized without a hearing as
provided in subsection 2 of this section may object to the
hospitalization. Upon transfer of the respondent to the
hospital, the hospital shall notify the respondent of his or
her right to object under this section. Upon receipt of an
objection to the hospitalization, the court shall schedule a
hearing for a determination that the individual requires
hospitalization. The respondent shall have all rights
specified in section 632.593 at the hearing. The court
shall order the respondent discharged from hospitalization


unless the court or jury finds, based upon clear and
convincing evidence, that the respondent requires
hospitalization as a result of the respondent's failure to
comply with the order for assisted outpatient treatment.
632.610. Beginning December 1, 2028, the office of
state courts administrator shall submit an annual report to
the general assembly summarizing:
(1) The number of individuals subject to orders for
assisted outpatient treatment;
(2) Statistics on compliance and noncompliance rates
with assisted outpatient treatment; and
(3) Any impact that assisted outpatient treatment has
on hospitalization and incarceration rates.